public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.dic
guariso/n0T8N8tClC7CJ1I1FSgv	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:guarir
guarènto/T8N8tBlB7BJ1I1FSgv	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:guarentar
guarno/t8n8tAlA7AJ1gv	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular st:guarnar
guàstomi/t8n8tAlA7AI1gv	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative st:guastar
véñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7@0'0^8-0-1^4^7^2.0*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
voƚer/t070t1t2p474P0P7Q0Q7'0^8^7.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
vóltomi/t8n8tAlA7AI1'0-1+0.0^6*0	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative st:voltar
nu/'9	po:pronoun_free_reflexive is:first+plural
la/'9Vp	po:pronoun_clitic_complement_direct is:third+singular+femenine
adove/'9	po:pronoun_interrogative_exclamatory
andove/'9'0	po:pronoun_interrogative_exclamatory
sto/M0'9	po:adjective_demonstrative_near is:singular+masculine
de/'9	po:preposition
ñove/N1N2|1|2|3%0%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
óndexe/N3|3%0%a'9	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
dódexe/N3|3%0%a'9	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
kuatòrdexe/N3|3%0%a'9	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
sédexe/N3|3%0%a'9	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
dixsète/N3|3%0%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
dixesète/N3|3%0%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
dexeòto/N3|3%0%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
dexedòto/N3|3%0%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
dexnove/N3|3%0%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
dexenove/N3|3%0%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
vinti/N3N4|3|4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
trenta/N3N4|3|4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
kuaranta/N3N4|3|4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
ŧinkuanta/N3N4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
sinkuanta/|3|4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
sesanta/N3N4|3|4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
setanta/N3N4|3|4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
otanta/N3N4|3|4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
nonanta/N3N4|3|4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
novanta/N3N4|3|4%0%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
ŧento/FSN5%1%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
miƚe/|6%0%7	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
melion/MFB1BuPd%0%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
meƚion/MFBu%0%7Pd	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
miƚion/MFBu%0%7Pd	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
meliardo/M0FS%0%a	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
meƚiardo/M0%0%7	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
miƚiardo/M0%0%7	po:numeral_cardenal is:masculine+non_enumerable
tèrŧa/F0'9	po:numeral_ordenal is:singular+femenine
par/'9	po:preposition
i/%2	po:numeral_latin
v/%2	po:numeral_latin
x/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
xx/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
xxx/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
l/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
c/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
d/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
m/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
s/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
A/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
mol/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
N/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Pl/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
S/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
H/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Bq/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
b/$0$3Z0	po:unit_of_measure
B/$0$3Z0	po:unit_of_measure
eV/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
u/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
mmHg/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Torr/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
alora/'0	po:adverb pa:a pa:la pa:ora
guastador/M0Pdv0gv	po:noun is:singular+masculine
pié/MFp3	po:noun is:masculine
sílaba/F0p2p3	po:noun is:singular+femenine
síƚaba/F0p2p3	po:noun is:singular+femenine
vardadura/F0d0eT'0.0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
xlísego/A1FSp2p3	po:adjective_qualificative is:singular+masculine
xlíŧego/A1FSp2p3	po:adjective_qualificative is:singular+masculine
èko/P0PlP7FS'0	po:interjection
guanto/M0FSo0o2o4gv	po:noun is:singular+masculine
fede/F0'9	po:noun is:singular+femenine
pè/MFp3	po:noun is:masculine
vèca/F0aTaZaSeTiNoT'0	po:adjective_qualificative is:singular+femenine
tanto/FS'9	po:adverb
àngol/M0B1PdV3p3	po:noun is:singular+masculine
guantèr/M0Buv0gv	po:noun is:singular+masculine
piè/MFp3	po:noun is:masculine
voƚèga/F0'0	po:noun is:singular+femenine
guardapólvar/MFgv	po:noun is:singular+masculine
guardianado/M0FSy0gv	po:noun is:singular+masculine
àngul/M0B2p3	po:noun is:singular+masculine
ànguƚo/M0p3	po:noun is:singular+masculine
volentieri/'0	po:adverb
guantiera/F0eTo1o3gv	po:noun is:singular+femenine
